src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/pt-pt-g2.ctb
word actividade 1-2345-1236-145
word actividades 1-2345-1236-145-234
word agora 1245
midword airr 1-24-1235-1235
endword al 13
begmidword alb 13-12
begmidword alc 13-14
midword alcont 13-25-2345
begmidword ald 13-145
endword aldade 13-46-145
endword aldades 13-46-145-234
begmidword alf 13-124
begmidword alfr 13-16
begmidword alg 13-1245
word algum 1-1245
word alguma 1-1245-1
word algumas 1-1245-146
word alguns 1-1245-234
word aliás 1-12356
begmidword alj 13-245
begmidword alm 13-134
endword almente 13-56-134
midword aln 13-1345
begmidword alp 13-1234
begmidword alqu 13-12345
midword alr 13-1235
begmidword als 13-234
begmidword alt 13-2345
begmidword altr 13-356
begmidword alv 13-1236
begmidword alz 13-1356
begmidword alç 13-12346
word além 1-123456
begmidword amb 345-12
begmidword ambr 345-23
begmidword amp 345-1234
begmidword ampl 345-1246
midword ampr 345-235
begmidword anc 2-14
begmidword and 2-145
endword andade 2-46-145
endword andades 2-46-145-234
begmidword anf 2-124
begmidword anfr 2-16
begmidword ang 2-1245
begmidword angr 2-12456
begmidword anj 2-245
begmidword anqu 2-12345
begmidword ans 2-234
begmidword ant 2-2345
word ante 2456
begword ante 2456
endword ante 2456
word antes 2456-234
endword antes 2456-234
endword anticamente 2-5-2345-56-134
begmidword antr 2-356
begmidword anz 2-1356
midword anç 2-12346
word apenas 1-1234-1345
word aquela 1-12345-1
word aquelas 1-12345-146
word aquele 1-12345-15
word aqueles 1-12345-156
endword ar 4
midword arb 4-12
midword arc 4-14
midword ard 4-145
midword arf 4-124
midword arg 4-1245
endword arica 1-5-1235
endword aricamente 1-5-1235-56-134
endword aricas 1-5-1235-234
endword arico 1-4-1235
endword aricos 1-4-1235-234
midword arj 4-245
midword arl 4-123
midword arm 4-134
endword armente 4-56-134
midword arn 4-1345
midword arp 4-1234
midword arqu 4-12345
midword arr 4-1235
endword arrica 4-5-1235
endword arricas 4-5-1235-234
endword arrico 1-1235-4-1235
endword arricos 1-1235-4-1235-234
midword ars 4-234
midword art 4-2345
midword artr 4-356
midword arv 4-1236
midword arx 4-1346
midword arz 4-1356
midword arç 4-12346
word as 146
endword as 146
midword asb 146-12
begmidword asc 146-14
midword asconc 146-25-14 
begword asd 146-145
begmidword asf 146-124
midword asg 146-1245
midword asl 146-123
begmidword asm 146-134
endword asmente 146-56-134
begmidword asn 146-1345
begmidword asp 146-1234
begmidword asqu 146-12345
begmidword ass 146-234
begmidword ast 146-2345
endword astica 146-5-2345
endword asticamente 146-5-2345-56-134
endword asticas 146-5-2345-234
endword astico 146-4-2345
begmidword astr 146-356
midword asç 146-12346
word através 1-356-1236
word base 12-15
word bases 12-156
word bem 12
word bens 12-234
begmidword br 23
word braille 23-123
word cada 14-145
word campo 14-135
word campos 14-13456
word capaz 14-1356
word capazes 14-1356-234
word casa 14-234-1
word casas 14-234-146
word caso 14-234
word casos 14-234-234
word cega 14-1245-1
word cegas 14-1245-146
word cego 14-1245
word cegos 14-1245-234
word coisa 14-1
word coisas 14-146
word com 14
word como 14-134
begmidword conc 25-14
begmidword cond 25-145
word condições 25-145-234
word condição 25-145
begmidword conf 25-124
begmidword confr 25-16
begmidword cong 25-1245
begmidword congr 25-12456
begmidword conj 25-245
begmidword conl 25-123
begword conn 25-1345
begmidword conqu 25-12345
begmidword cons 25-234
begmidword cont 25-2345
begmidword contr 25-356
begmidword conv 25-1236
word corpo 14-1234
word corpos 14-1234-234
endword dade 46-145
endword dades 46-145-234
word de 145
word depois 145-1234
word desde 145-145
word deseja 145-245-1
word desejas 145-245-146
word desejo 145-245
word desejos 145-245-234
begword dextr 145-1346-356
word diferente 145-124-1235-2345
word diferentes 145-124-1235-2345-234
word diferença 145-124-1235
word diferenças 145-124-1235-234
word dificuldade 145-124-145
word dificuldades 145-124-145-234
word difíceis 145-124-234
word difícil 145-124
word diversa 145-1236-1
word diversas 145-1236-146
word diverso 145-1236
word diversos 145-1236-234
word efeito 15-124
word efeitos 15-124-234
word eira 5-15
endword eira 5-15
endword eiramente 5-15-56-134
word eiras 5-15-234
endword eiras 5-15-234
endword eiro 4-15
endword eiros 4-15-234
word ele 123
word eles 123-234
endword em 256
begmidword emb 256-12
word embora 256-12
begmidword embr 256-23
begmidword emp 256-1234
begmidword empl 256-1246
begmidword empr 256-235
begmidword enc 26-14
begmidword encontr 26-25-356
word encontrem 26-25-356-15-134
begmidword end 26-145
begmidword enf 26-124
begmidword enfr 26-16
begmidword eng 26-1245
begmidword engr 26-12456
begmidword enj 26-245
begmidword enl 26-123
begmidword enqu 26-12345
word enquanto 26-12345-2345
begmidword enr 26-1235
always ens 26-234
begmidword ent 26-2345
endword entica 26-5-2345
endword enticamente 26-5-2345-56-134
endword enticas 26-5-2345-234
endword entico 26-4-2345
begmidword entr 26-356
word entre 26-15
word entrem 26-356-15-134
begmidword env 26-1236
begmidword enx 26-1346
begmidword enz 26-1356
midword enç 26-12346
midword erb 236-12
midword erc 236-14
midword ercont 236-25-2345
midword ercontr 236-25-356
midword erd 236-145
endword erdade 236-46-145
endword erdades 236-46-145-234
midword erf 236-124
midword erg 236-1245
endword erica 15-5-1235
endword ericamente 15-5-1235-56-134
endword ericas 15-5-1235-234
endword erico 15-4-1235
endword ericos 15-4-1235-234
midword erj 236-245
midword erl 236-123
midword erm 236-134
endword ermenta 236-5-134
endword ermentas 236-5-134-234
endword ermento 236-4-134
endword ermentos 236-4-134-234
midword ern 236-1345
midword erp 236-1234
midword erpl 236-1246
midword erpr 236-235
midword erqu 236-12345
midword err 236-1235
midword ers 236-234
midword ert 236-2345
midword erv 236-1236
midword erx 236-1346
midword erz 236-1356
midword erç 236-12346
endword es 156
begmidword esb 156-12
begmidword  esbr 156-23
begmidword esc 156-14
midword esconc 156-25-14
begmidword escond 156-25-145
midword esconf 156-25-124
midword escong 156-25-1245
begmidword esconj 156-25-245
midword escons 156-25-234
midword escont 156-25-2345
midword escontr 156-25-356
midword esconv 156-25-1236
midword esd 156-145
begmidword esf 156-124
begmidword esfr 156-16
begmidword esg 156-1245
begmidword esgr 156-12456
begmidword esl 156-123
begmidword esm 156-134
endword esmente 156-56-134
midword esn 156-1345
begmidword esp 156-1234
word especiais 15-14-2346
word especial 15-14-123
word especialmente 15-14-123-134
begmidword espl 156-1246
begmidword espr 156-235
word espécie 15-14
word espécies 15-14-234
begmidword esqu 156-12345
begmidword ess 156-234
begmidword est 156-2345
word esta 15-1
word estas 15-146
word este 15-15
word estes 15-156
endword estica 156-5-2345
endword esticamente 156-5-2345-56-134
endword esticas 156-5-2345-234
endword estico 156-4-2345
endword esticos 156-4-2345-234
begmidword estr 156-356
begmidword esv 156-1236
midword esç 156-12346
endword eu 5
midword eub 5-12
midword euc 5-14
midword eud 5-145
midword euf 5-124
midword eug 5-1245
midword euj 5-245
midword eul 5-123
midword eum 5-134
midword eun 5-1345
midword eup 5-1234
midword euqu 5-12345
midword eur 5-1235
midendword eus 5-234
midword eut 5-2345
midword eutr 5-356
midword euv 5-1236
word evidência 15-1236-14
word evidências 15-1236-14-234
begword exc 1346-14   *1
word exemplo 15-1246
word exemplos 15-1246-234
begword exp 1346-1234   *2
word experiência 1346-1234-14
word experiências 1346-1234-14-234
begword expl 1346-1246   *3
begword expr 1346-235   *4
begmidword ext 1346-2345
begmidword extr 1346-356
word facto 124-2345
word factos 124-2345-234
word fica 5-124
endword fica 5-124
endword ficamente 5-124-56-134
word ficas 5-124-234
endword ficas 5-124-234
word fico 4-124
endword fico 4-124
endword ficos 4-124-234
word filha 124-125-1
word filhas 124-125-146
word filho 124-125
word filhos 124-125-234
word fim 124
word fins 124-234
word fora 124-1
word forma 124-134
word formas 124-134-234
word formações 124-134-12346-234
word formação 124-134-12346
word força 124-135
word forças 124-135-234
begmidword fr 16
midword frâ 124-1235-16
word fáceis 124-14-234
word fácil 124-14
word fundamentais 124-145-134-2345-2346
word fundamental 124-145-134-2345-123  
endword gica 5-1245
endword gicamente 5-1245-56-134
endword gicas 5-1245-234
endword gico 4-1245
endword gicos 4-1245-234
word governa 1245-1236-1345-1
word governas 1245-1236-1345-146
word governo 1245-1236-1345
word governos 1245-1236-1345-234
begmidword gr 12456
word grupo 12456-1234
word grupos 12456-1234-234
word hoje 125-245
word homem 125-134
word homens 125-134-234
word ideia 24-145
word ideias 24-145-234
endword im 246
begmidword imb 246-12
begmidword imbr 246-23
word imediata 24-134-1
word imediatamente 24-134-134
word imediatas 24-134-146
word imediato 24-134
word imediatos 24-134-234
begmidword imp 246-1234
begmidword impl 246-1246
begmidword impr 246-235
begword inexc 24-1345-1346-14
begword inexp 24-1345-1346-1234
begword inexpl 24-1345-1346-1246
begword inexpr 24-1345-1346-235
begword inext 24-1345-1346-2345
begword inextr 24-1345-1346-356
endword ir 46
midword irb 46-12
midword irc 46-14
midword irg 46-1245
endword irica 24-5-1235
endword iricamente 24-5-1235-56-134
endword iricas 24-5-1235-234
endword irico 24-4-1235
endword iricos 24-4-1235-234
midword irl 46-123
midword irm 46-134
midword irn 46-1345
midword irp 46-1234
midword irr 46-1235
midword irs 46-234
midword irt 46-2345
midword irv 46-1236
endword is 2346
midword isb 2346-12
begmidword isc 2346-14
midword iscond 2346-25-145
midword iscons 2346-25-234
midword isf 2346-124
midword isfr 2346-16
midword isg 2346-1245
midword isj 2346-245
begmidword isl 2346-123
begmidword ism 2346-134
midword isn 2346-1345
midword isp 2346-1234
midword ispl 2346-1246
begmidword isqu 2346-12345
begmidword isr 2346-1235
begmidword iss 2346-234
begmidword ist 2346-2345
endword isticamente 2346-5-2345-56-134
word isto 24-2345
midword istr 2346-356
word jovem 245-1236
word jovens 245-1236-234
word já 245
word juízo 245-1356
word juízos 245-1356-234
word lado 123-145
word lados 123-145-234
midword lh 125
word lhe 125-15
word lhes 125-156
endword loga 5-123
endword logamente 5-123-56-134
endword logas 5-123-234
word logo 4-123
endword logo 4-123
endword logos 4-123-234
word longa 123-1245-1
word longas 123-1245-146
word longo 123-1245
word longos 123-1245-234
word lugar 123-1235
word lugares 123-1235-234
word maior 1235
word maiores 1235-234
word materiais 134-2345-1235-2346
word material 134-2345-1235-123
word matéria 134-2345-1235
word matérias 134-2345-1235-234
word me 134
word melhor 134-1235
word melhores 134-1235-234
word menos 134-1345
word menta 5-134
endword menta 5-134
endword mentas 5-134-234
word mente 56-134
endword mente 56-134
word mentes 56-134-234
endword mentes 56-134-234
word mento 4-134
endword mento 4-134
word mentos 4-134-234
endword mentos 4-134-234
word moda 134-145-1
word modas 134-145-146
word modo 134-145
word modos 134-145-234
word movimenta 134-1236-134-2345-1
word movimentas 134-1236-134-2345-146
word movimento 134-1236-134-2345
word movimentos 134-1236-134-2345-234
word muita 134-2345-1
word muitas 134-2345-146
word muito 134-2345
word muitos 134-2345-234
word mulher 134-125
word mulheres 134-125-234
word número 1345-1235
word números 1345-1235-234
word nada 1345-145
word nadas 1345-145-234
word naturais 1345-2345-2346
word natural 1345-2345-123
word natureza 1345-2345-1356
word naturezas 1345-2345-1356-234
word necessariamente 1345-14-1235-134
word necessidade 1345-14-145
word necessidades 1345-14-145-234
word necessária 1345-14-1235-1
word necessárias 1345-14-1235-146
word necessário 1345-14-1235
word necessários 1345-14-1235-234
word nenhum 1345-1345
word nenhuma 1345-1345-1
word nenhumas 1345-1345-146
word nenhuns 1345-1345-234
midword nh 2356
word nica 5-1345
endword nica 5-1345
endword nicamente 5-1345-56-134
word nicas 5-1345-234
endword nicas 5-1345-234
word nico 4-1345
endword nico 4-1345
word nicos 4-1345-234
